Utah statutes.
23-15-5.   Notice of intention to drain or divert waterway.

Any person, company or corporation owning or controlling any irrigation canal, ditch, reservoir, millrace, or other waterway leading from or into any state waterway containing protected aquatic wildlife who shall desire to drain any such waterway, or who shall intend to divert sufficient water from any state waterway endangering the protected aquatic wildlife therein, shall give five days' written notice to the Division of Wildlife Resources prior to the diversion except that under emergency conditions reasonable notice shall be given.

